Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2601
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-2601 to 25-2622 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Arbitration Act.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 151, § 1.